Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-173
Defunct postsecondary institution; records; University of Nebraska-Lincoln; depository.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the trustees or officers of any postsecondary institution, upon going out of existence or ceasing to function as a postsecondary institution, may turn over its student records to the central depository maintained by the office of registrar of the University of Nebraska-Lincoln as provided in section 85-174.

(2) The trustees or officers of any for-profit postsecondary institution as defined in section 85-2403, upon going out of existence or ceasing to function as a postsecondary institution, shall turn over its student records to the central depository maintained by the office of registrar of the University of Nebraska-Lincoln as provided in section 85-174.

Laws 1937, c. 179, § 1, p. 709;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 85-179;

R.S.1943, § 85-173;

Laws 2017, LB512, § 21.